tests/syntax/unused.sbl
// Test unused variables, routines and groupings.
externals (stem)
integers (x unused_int)
booleans (b unused_bool)
strings (unused string)
routines (r r2 r3 undef_routine)
groupings (g undef_grouping)
define g 'aeiou'
define r2 as not atlimit
define r3 as (atlimit or 'x')
define r as (
   r3 r3
   unset b
   try (next set b)
   $x = size
   b
   $(x > 2)
   g
   among ('should' 'not' 'leak' r2)
)

define stem as true
